Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1100.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of November 6, 1987 (P.L.381, No.79), known as the Older Adults Protective Services Act, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 303.1. Fatality review teams.(a) Establishment.--In each agency, the department shall establish and monitor the maintenance of a fatality review team for the purpose of reviewing any death of an older adult that occurs during a period in which there exists an investigation into allegations of abuse or neglect of the deceased.(b) Composition.--A fatality review team shall be composed 123456789101112131415161718192021 of:(1) The director of the agency.(2) An employee of the agency.(3) A member of the advisory committee or board of the agency.(4) A physician, geriatrician or primary care physician who works in the area of care for older adults.(5) A victim services representative.(6) A member of local law enforcement.(7) A behavior health or intellectual disabilities service provider representative.(8) A community crisis intervention services representative.(9) An attorney trained in legal representation of older adults.(c) Cooperation.--A fatality review team may work in conjunction with:(1) The district attorney.(2) The coroner.(3) Any other persons who have knowledge regarding fatal incidents in connection with abuse of older adults, including knowledge of research, policy, law and other matters connected with fatal incidents involving older adults, or who are recommended for inclusion by the fatality review team.(d) Chairperson.--The agency, in consultation with the fatality review team, shall appoint a member of the fatality review team, who is not an employee of the agency, to serve as chairperson.(e) Maintenance of fatality review team.--(1) Participation in a fatality review team shall be 20250SB1100PN1330 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 voluntary.(2) Members shall serve without compensation and may not be provided a per diem or reimbursed travel expenses.(3) Members shall serve for terms of two years.(4) If a member does not complete the two-year term, the agency shall be responsible for filling the vacancy as follows:(i) The agency shall fill a vacancy within 60 days of the opening.(ii) A member appointed under subparagraph (i) shall serve for a two-year term, calculated from the date of the member's appointment.(5) Following the completion of a member's two-year term, the agency shall maintain the composition of the fatality review team by filling the vacancy. The agency shall fill the vacancy within 45 days of the opening. A member may be reappointed.(6) The agency shall notify the department of any change to the member status of its fatality review team.(f) Powers and duties.--(1) The fatality review team shall examine deaths and serious injuries associated with suspected abuse or neglect of older adults. The purpose of the examination is to identify whether systems with the responsibility to assist or protect victims were sufficient for the particular circumstances or whether the systems require improvement.(2) Members of the team shall be responsible for all of the following:(i) Providing and discussing relevant case-specific information.20250SB1100PN1330 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) Attending and participating in all meetings and activities as required.(iii) Assisting in the development of oral or written notice, to include notice by electronic technologies, under paragraph (5).(3) Upon receipt of the report of an older adult fatality, the fatality review team shall immediately commence its examination, the performance of which shall include, at minimum:(i) A review of the circumstances of the older adult's fatality including whether the fatality is likely to be the result of suspected or substantiated abuse.(ii) A review of the delivery of services to the older adult provided by the agency and review of services, if any, provided by an agency in each county where the older adult resided or received services within the six months preceding the fatality. For the purposes of this subparagraph, services shall include law enforcement, mental health services, programs for older adults and older adults with special needs, drug and alcohol programs, senior centers and health care providers.(iii) A review of relevant court records and documents.(iv) A review of the agency's compliance with statutes and regulations and with relevant policies and procedures of the agency.(4) A fatality review team member may not contact, interview or obtain information by request directly from the family of the deceased unless the fatality review team member 20250SB1100PN1330 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 is authorized to do so in the course of that team member's employment duties. A member of the deceased older adult's family may voluntarily provide information or any record to a fatality review team.(5) Within 90 days from the date of the commencement of the examination of the older adult fatality, the fatality review team shall submit to the department a written report, which shall include, at minimum:(i) Deficiencies and strengths in:(A) Compliance with statutes and regulations.(B) Protective services to older adults.(ii) Recommendations to improve protective services systems and community resources to reduce older adult abuse and related fatalities in the fatality review team's jurisdiction.(iii) Proposed solutions for inadequacies in the protective services systems.(iv) Recommendations to improve sources of information regarding the reporting and investigations of reported older adult abuse cases, including standards for the uniform and consistent reporting and investigations by law enforcement or other emergency service responders within the fatality review team's jurisdiction.(v) Recommendations for improvements to State laws and local partnerships, policies and practices to prevent older adult abuse and related deaths.(vi) Any subsequent information deemed pertinent by the fatality review team producing the report.(g) Annual summary reports.--(1) By November 1 of each year, the department shall 20250SB1100PN1330 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 prepare an annual summary report of all fatality review team information under subsection (f) and received by the department within the last year. The department's annual summary report shall be submitted to the Governor and the General Assembly.(2) Except as provided under subsection (h), following submission of the annual summary report to the Governor and General Assembly, the annual summary report shall be made available to the public through a publicly accessible Internet website, but confidential and privileged information shall be removed from the contents of the report. The report may not be released to the public if the district attorney certifies that release of the report may compromise a pending criminal investigation or proceeding. Certification by the district attorney shall stay the release of the report for a period of 60 days, at which time the report shall be released unless a new certification is made by the district attorney.(h) Release of information in confidential reports.--(1) The department's annual summary report which includes confidential and privileged information shall only be made available to:(i) The Governor and General Assembly as provided under subsection (g).(ii) An authorized official of a county requiring the information to carry out the authorized official's responsibilities under law to protect older adults from abuse and neglect.(iii) An authorized official of a Federal agency requiring the information to carry out the authorized official's responsibilities under law to protect older 20250SB1100PN1330 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 adults from abuse and neglect.(iv) An authorized official of an agency of another state that performs protective services analogous to the services performed by an agency or the department in the course of the authorized official's duties.(v) The members of each contributing fatality review team.(vi) An authorized official or agent of the department in accordance with department regulations or the conduct of a performance monitoring under this section.(vii) A court of competent jurisdiction.(viii) Pursuant to court order or subpoena.(ix) A law enforcement agency or a law enforcement official of any jurisdiction, in the course of official duties, if the information is relevant to the investigation.(x) A standing committee of the General Assembly, specifically having department legislative oversight.(xi) Federal auditors if required for Federal financial participation in funding of agencies except that Federal auditors may not remove identifiable reports or copies of the reports from the department or agency.(xii) Designated county officials, in reviewing the competence of the agency or its employees under this section. Officials under this subparagraph are limited to the following:(A) The board of commissioners of a county other than a county of the first class.(B) The board of directors of a nonprofit area 20250SB1100PN1330 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 agency on aging.(xiii) Appropriate officials of another county or state regarding an investigation related to older adult abuse when an older adult had moved to that county or state.(xiv) The Department of the Auditor General in conjunction with the performances of the duties designated to the Office of Auditor General, except that the Auditor General may not remove identifiable reports or copies of the report from the department or agency.(2) Upon a written request, the estate of the subject of a report may receive a copy of all information, except information prohibited from being disclosed under section 306.(3) All persons under this section having access to confidential information shall treat all reporting sources as confidential informants.(i) Investigating performance of agency.--(1) If, within 120 days from the date of the fatality under review, the fatality review team fails to submit a timely report, the department shall have the authority to make an inquiry into the performance of the agency which may include a performance audit of the agency.(2) If an agency, acting without a waiver under subsection (j), fails to maintain the composition of its fatality review team, the department shall have the authority to make an inquiry into the performance of the agency which may include a performance audit of the agency.(j) Waiver.--If an agency finds that compliance with one or more of the provisions of this section will not be feasible, it 20250SB1100PN1330 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall apply in writing to the department requesting a waiver, along with the reasons why the agency cannot comply. The secretary shall promptly render a decision as to the granting of the waiver and submit in writing to the relevant agency the basis for the decision.(k) Authority to access records.--To the extent permitted by law, the fatality review team may access records as follows:(1) The Department of Health shall provide records of a deceased older adult under review without the need for authorization of any person, including the executor, administrator or personal representative of the deceased older adult for purposes of review under this section.(2) T he fatality review team may review and inspect mental health care service files and records of a deceased older adult under review without the need for authorization of any person, including the executor, administrator or personal representative of the deceased older adult for purposes of review under this section.(3) Health care facilities, health care providers, pharmacies and mental health care providers shall provide medical records of a deceased older adult under review without the need for authorization of any person, including the executor, administrator or personal representative of the deceased older adult for purposes of review under this section.(4) If deemed necessary for its review, the fatality review team may petition the court to review and inspect all files and records of the court relating to a deceased older adult under review.(5) Other records pertaining to the deceased older adult 20250SB1100PN1330 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under review for the purposes of this section shall be open to inspection as permitted by law.(l) Requests for records.--(1) T he following shall be provided, to the extent permitted by law, to a fatality review team on written request of the chairperson or designee of a fatality review team:(i) Records regarding the physical health and mental health, maintained by a health care provider, hospital or health system, for a deceased older adult under review by a fatality review team.(ii) Records maintained by a State or local government agency or entity, including death investigative information, medical examiner investigative information, law enforcement investigative information, emergency medical services reports, fire department records, prosecutorial records, parole and probation information and records, court records and relevant information and records of a social services agency, including the Department of Human Services, if the agency or entity previously provided services to the deceased older adult under review by a fatality review team.(iii) The following shall comply with a records request by a fatality review team made under this subsection:(A) Coroner or medical examiner.(B) Fire department.(C) Health system.(D) Hospital.(E) Law enforcement agency.20250SB1100PN1330 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (F) State or local governmental agency, including the department, the Department of Health, the Department of Human Services and the Department of Corrections.(G) Mental health provider.(H) Health care provider.(I) Substance use disorder treatment provider.(J) EMS provider.(K) Social services provider.(L) Any other person or entity who is in possession of records pertinent to the fatality review team investigation of an older adult's death.(2) A person or entity subject to a records request by a fatality review team under this subsection may charge the fatality review team a reasonable fee for the service of duplicating any records requested by the fatality review team for which duplication is required.(3) Information, if requested by the chairperson or designee of the fatality review team, shall be provided within five business days of receipt of the written request, excluding weekends and holidays, unless an extension is granted by the chairperson or designee. Written requests may include a request submitted via email or any other type of transmission.(4) A fatality review team shall not need an administrative subpoena or other form of legal compulsion to receive requested records under this section. This paragraph shall not be construed to effect any right the fatality review team has to obtain an administrative subpoena or other form of legal compulsion.20250SB1100PN1330 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) Information received in response to a request under this section may be shared at a fatality review team meeting in accordance with subsection (m).(6) A record may not be released during the pendency of an investigation if the release of the record would hinder the progress of an active investigation or criminal proceeding.(m) Confidentiality of fatality review team records and meetings.--(1) A fatality review team meeting shall be closed to the public and information discussed at the meeting shall be confidential.(2) The proceedings, records and information maintained by and shared with a fatality review team may not be:(i) Disclosed under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.(ii) Subject to discovery, subpoena or introduction into evidence in a criminal or civil proceeding.(3) Information presented in or opinions formed as a result of a meeting of a fatality review team may not be subject to subpoena or discovery or admissible in evidence in a civil or criminal action. Nothing under this subsection shall be construed to prevent a member of a fatality review team from testifying in a criminal or civil proceeding to information obtained independently of participation in the fatality review team or to information which is publicly available.(n) Criminal and civil liability protections.--(1) An individual not a member of a fatality review team may, in good faith, provide information to a fatality review 20250SB1100PN1330 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 team for the purposes of this section. A member of a fatality review team may discuss confidential matters during a meeting of the fatality review team. The following shall apply:(i) A member of a fatality review team shall comply with applicable Federal and State laws regarding confidentiality.(ii) Except as provided under paragraph (2), a member of a fatality review team or an individual who, in good faith, provides information to a fatality review team may not be disciplined, criminally prosecuted or held administratively or civilly liable for complying with the provisions of this section.(2) The immunity specified under this subsection shall not apply to:(i) A member of a fatality review team or an individual providing information to a fatality review team by invitation who either discloses confidential information in a manner not in accordance with Federal or State law or who discloses confidential information to the fatality review team with malice, in bad faith or in a negligent manner.(ii) An individual suspected of abuse or neglect of an older adult.Section 2. Section 306(b) of the act is amended by adding a paragraph and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 306. Confidentiality of records.* * *(b) Limited access to the agency's protective services records.--20250SB1100PN1330 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *(7) For examinations performed by fatality review teams under section 303.1, members of a fatality review team shall have access to all relevant information maintained by the agency or the department.(c) Distribution of annual summary report.--The department's annual summary report shall be made available consistent with section 303.1(h).Section 3. This act shall take effect in 120 days.20250SB1100PN1330 - 14 - 123456789